Illinois, session 104th, SB3025.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Clean Elections Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Certified candidate" means a candidate running for 8Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State 9Treasurer, State Comptroller, State Senator, or State 10Representative, in a primary election, and Governor, Secretary 11of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, State 12Comptroller, State Senator, or State Representative, in a 13general election who chooses to participate in this Act and 14who is certified as an Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate 15under subsection (e) of Section 20.16    "Contribution" has the same meaning as in Article 9 of the 17Election Code.18    "Fund" means the Illinois Clean Elections Fund established 19in Section 15.20    "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate running for 21Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State 22Treasurer, State Comptroller, State Senator, or State 23Representative, in a primary election, and Governor, Secretary   SB3025- 2 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, State 2Comptroller, State Senator, or State Representative, in a 3general election who does not choose to participate in this 4Act and who is not seeking to be certified as an Illinois Clean 5Elections Act candidate.6    "Participating candidate" means a candidate who is running 7for Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State 8Treasurer, State Comptroller, State Senator, or State 9Representative, in a primary election, and Governor, Secretary 10of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, State 11Comptroller, State Senator, or State Representative, in a 12general election who is seeking to be certified as an Illinois 13Clean Elections Act candidate.14    "Qualifying contribution" means a donation:15        (1) Of $5 in the form of a check or a money order 16    payable to the Fund in support of a candidate;17        (2) Made by a registered voter within the district for 18    the office a candidate is seeking;19        (3) Made during the designated qualifying period and 20    obtained with the knowledge and approval of the candidate; 21    and22        (4) That is acknowledged by a written receipt that 23    identifies the name and address of the donor on forms 24    provided by the State Board.25    "Qualifying period" means the following:26        (1) For a participating candidate for Governor,   SB3025- 3 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    Secretary of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, or 2    State Comptroller, the qualifying period begins November 1 3    immediately preceding the election year and ends at 5:00 4    p.m. on April 15 of the election year unless the candidate 5    is unenrolled, in which case the period ends at 5:00 p.m. 6    on June 2 of the election year.7        (2) For State Senate or State House of Representatives 8    participating candidates, the qualifying period begins 9    January 1 of the election year and ends at 5:00 p.m. on 10    April 15 of that election year unless the candidate is 11    unenrolled, in which case the period ends at 5:00 p.m. on 12    June 2 of the election year.13    "Seed money contribution" means a contribution of no more 14than $100 per individual made to a contribution from the 15candidate or the candidate's family. To be eligible for 16certification, a candidate may collect and spend only seed 17money contributions subsequent to becoming a candidate as 18defined by Article 9 of the Election Code and throughout the 19qualifying period. A participating candidate who has accepted 20contributions or made expenditures that do not comply with the 21seed money restrictions under this Act may petition the State 22Board to remain eligible for certification as an Illinois 23Clean Elections Act candidate in accordance with rules of the 24State Board, if the failure to comply was unintentional and 25does not constitute a significant infraction of these 26restrictions. Prior to certification, a candidate may obligate   SB3025- 4 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1an amount greater than the seed money collected if the value of 2the goods and services received from a vendor does not exceed 3the amount paid to the vendor. A candidate may not collect or 4spend seed money contributions after certification as an 5Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate. A seed money 6contribution shall be reported according to procedures 7developed by the State Board.8    "State Board" means the State Board of Elections.  9    Section 10. Alternative campaign financing option. This 10Act establishes an alternative campaign financing option 11available to candidates running for Governor, Secretary of 12State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, State Comptroller, 13State Senator, and State Representative. This alternative 14campaign financing option is available to candidates for 15elections to be held beginning in the year 2028. The State 16Board shall administer this Act and the Fund. Candidates 17participating in this Act shall also comply with all other 18applicable election and campaign laws and regulations.  19    Section 15. The Illinois Clean Elections Fund established; 20sources of funding. 21    (a) The Illinois Clean Elections Fund is established as a 22special fund in the State treasury to finance the election 23campaigns of certified Illinois Clean Elections Act candidates 24running for Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State,   SB3025- 5 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1State Treasurer, State Comptroller, State Senator, and State 2Representative and to pay administrative and enforcement costs 3of the State Board related to this Act. Any interest generated 4by the Fund is credited to the Fund. The State Board shall 5administer the Fund.6    (b) The following shall be deposited into the Fund:7        (1) The qualifying contributions required under 8    Section 20 when those contributions are submitted to the 9    State Board.10        (2) $40,000,000 of the revenues from the taxes imposed 11    by the Illinois Income Tax Act and credited to the General 12    Revenue Fund, transferred to the Fund by the State 13    Treasurer on or before January 1 of each year, beginning 14    January 1, 2027. These revenues shall be offset in an 15    equitable manner by an equivalent reduction within the 16    administrative divisions of the legislative branch and 17    executive branch agencies. If the State Board determines 18    that the Fund will not have sufficient revenues to cover 19    the likely demand for funds from the Illinois Clean 20    Elections Fund in an upcoming calendar year, by January 1 21    the State Board shall provide a report of its projections 22    of the balances in the Illinois Clean Elections Fund to 23    the General Assembly and the Governor and may request that 24    the State Treasurer make the following transfers to the 25    Illinois Clean Elections Fund from the General Revenue 26    Fund:   SB3025- 6 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1            (A) Up to $20,000,000 no later than February 28, 2        2027, reflecting an advance of the transfer of the 3        amounts that would be received on or before January 1, 4        2028 under this paragraph.5            (B) Up to $15,000,000 no later than July 31, 2027, 6        under this paragraph reflecting an advance of the 7        transfer of the amounts that would be received on or 8        before January 1, 2028 under this paragraph.9            (C) Up to $5,000,000 no later than September 1, 10        2029, reflecting a partial advance of the transfer of 11        the amounts that would be received on or before 12        January 1, 2030 under this paragraph.13        (3) Revenue from a tax checkoff program allowing a 14    resident of the State who files a tax return with the 15    Department of Revenue to designate that $3 be paid into 16    the Fund. If a married couple files a joint return, each 17    spouse may designate that $3 be paid. The Department of 18    Revenue shall report annually the amounts designated for 19    the Fund to the State Treasurer, who shall transfer that 20    amount to the Fund.21        (4) Seed money contributions remaining unspent after a 22    candidate has been certified as an Illinois Clean 23    Elections Act candidate.24        (5) Fund revenues that were distributed to an Illinois 25    Clean Elections Act candidate and that remain unspent 26    after the candidate has lost a primary election or after   SB3025- 7 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    all general elections.2        (6) Other unspent Fund revenues distributed to any 3    Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate who does not remain 4    a candidate throughout a primary or general election 5    cycle.6        (7) Voluntary donations made directly to the Fund.7        (8) Fines collected under this Act.8    (c) By September 1 preceding each election year, the State 9Board shall publish an estimate of revenue in the Fund 10available for distribution to certified candidates during the 11upcoming year's elections and an estimate of the likely demand 12for clean elections funding during that election. The State 13Board may submit legislation to request additional funding. 14    Section 20. Terms of participation. 15    (a) A participating candidate shall file a declaration of 16intent to seek certification as an Illinois Clean Elections 17Act candidate and to comply with the requirements of this Act. 18The declaration of intent shall be filed with the State Board 19prior to or during the qualifying period, except as provided 20in subsection (l), according to forms and procedures developed 21by the State Board. A participating candidate shall submit a 22declaration of intent within 5 business days after collecting 23qualifying contributions under this Act or the qualifying 24contributions collected before the declaration of intent has 25been filed will not be counted toward the eligibility   SB3025- 8 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1requirement in subsection (c).2    (b) Subsequent to becoming a candidate defined by and 3prior to certification, a participating candidate may not 4accept contributions, except for seed money contributions. A 5participating candidate shall limit the candidate's seed money 6contributions to the following amounts:7        (1) $50,000 for a gubernatorial candidate.8        (2) $25,000 for a candidate for Secretary of State, 9    Attorney General, State Treasurer, or State Comptroller.10        (3) $10,000 for a candidate for the State Senate.11        (4) $5,000 for a candidate for the State House of 12    Representatives. 13    The State Board may, by rule, revise these amounts to 14ensure the effective implementation of this Act.15    (c) Participating candidates shall obtain qualifying 16contributions during the qualifying period as follows:17        (1) For a candidate for Governor, Secretary of State, 18    Attorney General, State Treasurer, or State Comptroller, 19    the minimum number of qualifying donations from verified 20    registered voters of this State is equal to the minimum 21    number of signatures required for a candidate petition for 22    a statewide office under subsection (a) of Section 7-10 of 23    the Election Code.24        (2) For a candidate for the State Senate, the minimum 25    number of qualifying donations from verified registered 26    voters of this State is equal to the minimum number of   SB3025- 9 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    signatures required for a candidate petition for a State 2    Senator under Section 8-8 of the Election Code.3        (3) For a candidate for the State House of 4    Representatives, the minimum number of qualifying 5    donations from verified registered voters of this State is 6    equal to the minimum number of signatures required for a 7    candidate petition for a Representative in the General 8    Assembly under Section 8-8 of the Election Code.9    A payment, gift, or anything of value may not be given in 10exchange for a qualifying contribution. A candidate may pay 11the fee for a money order in the amount of $5, which is a 12qualifying contribution, as long as the donor making the 13qualifying contribution pays the $5 amount reflected on the 14money order. Any money order fees paid by a participating 15candidate shall be paid for with seed money and reported in 16accordance with rules adopted by the State Board.17    (d) A participating candidate shall submit qualifying 18contributions to the State Board during the qualifying period 19according to procedures developed by the State Board, except 20as provided under subsection (l).21    (e) Upon receipt of a final submittal of qualifying 22contributions by a participating candidate, the State Board 23shall determine whether or not the candidate has:24        (1) Signed and filed a declaration of intent to 25    participate in this Act.26        (2) Submitted the appropriate number of valid   SB3025- 10 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    qualifying contributions.2        (3) Qualified as a candidate by petition or other 3    means.4        (4) Not accepted contributions, except for seed money 5    contributions, and otherwise complied with seed money 6    restrictions.7        (5) Not run for the same office as a nonparticipating 8    candidate in a primary election in the same election year.9        (6) Otherwise met the requirements for participation 10    in this Act.11    The State Board shall certify a candidate complying with 12the requirements of this Section as an Illinois Clean 13Elections Act candidate as soon as possible and no later than 3 14business days after final submittal of qualifying 15contributions. Upon certification, a candidate shall transfer 16to the Fund any unspent seed money contributions. A certified 17candidate shall comply with all requirements of this Act after 18certification and throughout the primary and general election 19periods. Failure to do so is a violation of this Act.20    (f) After certification, a candidate shall limit the 21candidate's campaign expenditures and obligations, including 22outstanding obligations, to the revenues distributed to the 23candidate from the Fund and may not accept any contributions 24unless specifically authorized by the State Board. Candidates 25may also accept and spend interest earned on bank accounts. 26All revenues distributed to a certified candidate from the   SB3025- 11 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1Fund shall be used for campaign-related purposes. The 2candidate, the treasurer, the candidate's political committee, 3or any agent of the candidate and committee may not use these 4revenues for any but campaign-related purposes. The State 5Board shall publish guidelines outlining permissible 6campaign-related expenditures.7    (g) The State Board shall distribute to certified 8candidates revenues from the Fund in amounts determined under 9subsection (h) in the following manner.10        (1) Within 3 days after certification, for candidates 11    certified prior to March 15 of the election year, revenues 12    from the Fund shall be distributed as if the candidates 13    are in an uncontested primary election.14        (2) Within 3 days after certification, for all 15    candidates certified between March 15 and April 15 of the 16    election year, revenues from the Fund shall be distributed 17    according to whether the candidate is in a contested or 18    uncontested primary election.19        (3) For candidates in contested primary elections 20    receiving a distribution under paragraph (1), additional 21    revenues from the fund shall be distributed within 3 days 22    after March 15 after the election year.23        (4) Within 3 days after the primary election results 24    are certified, for general election certified candidates, 25    revenues from the Fund shall be distributed according to 26    whether the candidate is in a contested or uncontested   SB3025- 12 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    general election.2    Funds may be distributed to certified candidates under 3this Section by any mechanism that is expeditious, ensures 4accountability, and safeguards the integrity of the Fund.5    (h) The candidate or committee shall deposit all revenues 6from the Fund in a campaign account with a bank or other 7financial institution. The campaign funds shall be segregated 8from, and may not be commingled with, any other funds.9    (i) By July 1, 2027 and at least every 4 years after that 10date, the State Board shall determine the amount of funds to be 11distributed to participating candidates based on the type of 12election and office as follows:13        (1) For contested legislative primary elections, the 14    amount of revenues to be distributed is the average amount 15    of campaign expenditures made by each candidate during all 16    contested primary election races for the immediately 17    preceding 2 primary elections, as reported in the initial 18    filing period subsequent to the primary election, for the 19    respective offices of State Senate and State House of 20    Representatives.21        (2) For uncontested legislative primary elections, the 22    amount of revenues distributed is the average amount of 23    campaign expenditures made by each candidate during all 24    uncontested primary election races for the immediately 25    preceding 2 primary elections, as reported in the initial 26    filing period subsequent to the primary election, for the   SB3025- 13 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    respective offices of State Senate and State House of 2    Representatives.3        (3) For contested legislative general elections, the 4    amount of revenues distributed is the average amount of 5    campaign expenditures made by each candidate during all 6    contested general election races for the immediately 7    preceding 2 general elections, as reported in the initial 8    filing period subsequent to the general election, for the 9    respective offices of State Senate and State House of 10    Representatives.11        (4) For uncontested legislative general elections, the 12    amount of revenues to be distributed from the Fund is 40% 13    of the amount distributed to a participating candidate in 14    a contested general election.15        (5) For gubernatorial primary elections, the amount of 16    revenues distributed is $2,000,000 per candidate in the 17    primary election.18        (6) For gubernatorial general elections, the amount of 19    revenues distributed is $4,000,000 per candidate in the 20    general election.21        (7) For contested primary elections for Attorney 22    General the amount of revenues distributed per candidate 23    is $500,000 per candidate.24        (8) For the general election for Attorney General, the 25    amount of funds distributed per candidate is $2,000,000.26        (9) For primary elections for Secretary of State the   SB3025- 14 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    amount of revenues distributed per candidate is $500,000 2    per candidate.3        (10) For the general election for Secretary of State, 4    the amount of funds distributed per candidate is 5    $2,000,000.6        (11) For contested primary elections for State 7    Treasurer, the amount of revenues distributed per 8    candidate is $200,000.9        (12) For the general election for State Treasurer, the 10    amount of funds distributed per candidate is $800,000.11        (13) For contested primary elections for State 12    Comptroller, the amount of revenues distributed per 13    candidate is $200,000.14        (14) For the general election for State Comptroller, 15    the amount of funds distributed per candidate is $800,000.16        (15) For any uncontested primary or general election 17    for the office of Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of 18    State, State Treasurer, or Comptroller, the amount of 19    funds distributed shall be 40% of those otherwise 20    distributed in a contested primary or general election.21    If the immediately preceding election cycles do not 22contain sufficient electoral data, the State Board shall use 23information from the most recent applicable elections.24    (j) When any campaign, finance, or election report shows 25that the sum of a candidate's expenditures or obligations, or 26funds raised or borrowed, whichever is greater, alone or in   SB3025- 15 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1conjunction with independent reported expenditures, exceeds 2the distribution amount under subsection (h), the State Board 3shall issue immediately to any opposing Illinois Clean 4Elections Act candidate an additional amount equivalent to the 5reported excess. Matching funds are limited to 2 times the 6amount originally distributed under paragraph (1), (3), (5), 7or (6) of subsection (h), whichever is applicable.8    (k) An unenrolled candidate certified by January 15 9preceding the primary election is eligible for revenues from 10the Fund in the same amounts and at the same time as an 11uncontested primary election candidate and a general election 12candidate as specified in subsections (g) and (h). For an 13unenrolled candidate not certified by January 15 at 5:00 p.m. 14the deadline for filing qualifying contributions is 5:00 p.m. 15on June 2 preceding the general election. An unenrolled 16candidate certified after January 15 at 5:00 p.m. is eligible 17for revenues from the Fund in the same amounts as a general 18election candidate, as specified in subsections (g) and (h).19    (l) The State Board shall establish by rule procedures for 20qualification, certification, disbursement of Fund revenues, 21and return of unspent Fund revenues for races involving 22special elections, recounts, vacancies, withdrawals, or 23replacement candidates.24    (m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 25participating and certified candidates shall report any money 26collected, all campaign expenditures, obligations, and related   SB3025- 16 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1activities to the State Board according to procedures 2developed by the State Board. Upon the filing of a final report 3for any primary election in which the candidate was defeated 4and for all general elections that candidate shall return all 5unspent Fund revenues to the State Board. In developing these 6procedures, the State Board shall utilize existing campaign 7reporting procedures whenever practicable. The State Board 8shall ensure timely public access to campaign finance data and 9may utilize electronic means of reporting and storing 10information.11    (n) The treasurer shall obtain and keep:12        (1) Bank or other account statements for the campaign 13    account covering the duration of the campaign.14        (2) A vendor invoice stating the particular goods or 15    services purchased for every expenditure of $50 or more.16        (3) A record proving that a vendor received payment 17    for every expenditure of $50 or more in the form of a 18    cancelled check, receipt from the vendor, or bank or 19    credit card statement identifying the vendor as the payee.20    The treasurer shall preserve the records for 2 years 21following the candidate's final campaign finance report for 22the election cycle. The candidate and treasurer shall submit 23photocopies of the records to the State Board upon its 24request.25    (o) The State Board may not distribute revenues to 26certified candidates in excess of the total amount of money   SB3025- 17 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1deposited into the Fund as set forth in Section 15. 2Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, if the State 3Board determines that the revenues in the Fund are 4insufficient to meet distributions under subsections (h) or 5(i), the State Board may permit certified candidates to accept 6and spend contributions, reduced by any seed money 7contributions, aggregating no more than $500 per donor per 8election for gubernatorial candidates and $250 per donor per 9election for State Senate and State House candidates, up to 10the applicable amounts set forth in subsections (h) and (i) 11according to rules adopted by the State Board.12    (p) A candidate who has been denied certification as an 13Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate, the opponent of a 14candidate who has been granted certification as an Illinois 15Clean Elections Act candidate, or other interested persons may 16challenge a certification decision by the State Board as 17follows:18        (1) A challenger may appeal to the full State Board 19    within 7 days after the certification decision. The appeal 20    shall be in writing and shall set forth the reasons for the 21    appeal.22        (2) Within 5 days after an appeal is properly made and 23    after notice is given to the challenger and any opponent, 24    the State Board shall hold a hearing. The appellant has 25    the burden of providing evidence to demonstrate that the 26    State Board decision was improper. The State Board shall   SB3025- 18 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    rule on the appeal within 3 days after the completion of 2    the hearing.3        (3) A challenger may appeal the decision of the State 4    Board in paragraph (2) by commencing an action in circuit 5    court.6        (4) A candidate whose certification by the State Board 7    as an Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate is revoked on 8    appeal shall return to the State Board any unspent 9    revenues distributed from the Fund.10    If the State Board or court finds that an appeal was made 11frivolously or to cause delay or hardship, the State Board or 12court may require the moving party to pay costs of the State 13Board, court, and opposing parties, if any.  14    Section 25. Rules. The State Board shall adopt rules to 15ensure effective administration of this Act. These rules shall 16include, but not be limited to, procedures for obtaining 17qualifying contributions, certification as an Illinois Clean 18Elections Act candidate, circumstances involving special 19elections, vacancies, recounts, withdrawals or replacements, 20collection of revenues for the Fund, distribution of Fund 21revenue to certified candidates, return of unspent Fund 22disbursements, disposition of equipment purchased with Clean 23Elections Funds, and compliance with this Act.  24    Section 30. Violations.   SB3025- 19 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1    (a) In addition to any other penalties that may be 2applicable, a person who violates any provision of this Act or 3rules adopted under this Act of the State Board adopted under 4Section 25 is subject to a fine not to exceed $10,000 per 5violation payable to the Fund. The State Board may assess a 6fine of up to $10,000 for a violation of reporting 7requirements if it determines that the failure to file a 8timely and accurate report resulted in the late payment of 9matching funds. This fine is recoverable in a civil action. In 10addition to any fine, for good cause shown, a candidate, 11treasurer, consultant, or other agent of the candidate or the 12committee authorized by the candidate found in violation of 13this Act or rules adopted under this Act of the State Board may 14be required to return to the Fund all amounts distributed to 15the candidate from the Fund or any funds not used for 16campaign-related purposes. If the State Board makes a 17determination that a violation of this Act or rules adopted 18under this Act of the State Board has occurred, the State Board 19shall assess a fine or transmit the finding to the Attorney 20General for prosecution. Fines paid under this Section shall 21be deposited into the Fund. In determining whether or not a 22candidate is in violation of the expenditure limits of this 23Act, the State Board may consider as a mitigating factor any 24circumstances out of the candidate's control.25    (b) A person who willfully or knowingly violates this Act 26or rules adopted under this Act of the State Board or who   SB3025- 20 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1willfully or knowingly makes a false statement in any report 2required by this Act commits a business offense punishable by 3a fine of at least $1,001 and not more than $5,000 and, if 4certified as an Illinois Clean Elections Act candidate, shall 5return to the Fund all amounts distributed to the candidate. 6    Section 35. Study report. By January 30, 2028 and every 4 7years after that date, the State Board shall prepare for the 8General Assembly a report documenting, evaluating, and making 9recommendations relating to the administration, 10implementation, and enforcement of this Act and the Illinois 11Clean Elections Fund.   12    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 13Section 5.1036 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 105/5.1036 new)15    Sec. 5.1036. The Illinois Judicial Election Democracy 16Trust Fund. 17    Section 95. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 18adding Section 507MMM as follows: 19    (35 ILCS 5/507MMM new)20    Sec. 507MMM. The Illinois Clean Elections Fund checkoff. 21For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2026, the   SB3025- 21 -LRB104 19389 SPS 32837 b1Department shall print on its standard individual income tax 2form a provision indicating that if the taxpayer wishes to 3contribute to the Illinois Clean Elections Fund, as authorized 4by the Illinois Clean Elections Act, he or she may do so by 5stating the amount of the contribution (not less than $3) on 6the return and that the contribution will reduce the 7taxpayer's refund or increase the amount of payment to 8accompany the return. Failure to remit any amount of increased 9payment shall reduce the contribution accordingly. This 10Section does not apply to any amended return. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.